Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 5

Private Act Metropolitan Hospital Authorities

7-57-501. Purpose and policy.

The public purpose and policy set forth in § 7-57-102(a) is also declared to be applicable to any hospital authority created by private act of the general assembly, sometimes referred to in this part as a “private act metropolitan hospital authority”, the principal hospital facilities of which are located in a county in this state with a population greater than two hundred fifty thousand (250,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census. For purposes of this part, “hospital authority” means hospital authorities, hospital districts, and hospitals owned and operated by one (1) or more local governments, directly or through an elected or appointed governing board.

The general assembly hereby finds that the demand for hospital, medical and health care services is rapidly changing, as is the way and manner in which such services are purchased and delivered; that the market for hospital and health care services is becoming increasingly competitive; and that the hospital and other health care providers need flexibility to be able to respond to changing conditions by having the power to develop efficient and cost-effective methods to provide for hospital, medical and health care needs. The general assembly also finds that the increasing competition and changing conditions force hospitals and other health care providers to develop market strategies and strategic plans to effectively compete. The general assembly further finds that public hospitals in metropolitan areas are presently at a competitive disadvantage, and that significant investments in the public assets of private act metropolitan hospital authorities could be jeopardized by inability to compete with private hospitals because of legal constraints upon the scope of their operations and limitations upon the power granted to public hospitals under existing law.

Acts 1995, ch. 119, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Attorney General Opinions. County hospital board of trustees' authority to sell hospital, OAG 98-0119, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 119 (7/2/98).

7-57-502. Powers granted.

In addition to the powers granted to it by any private act of the general assembly, a private act metropolitan hospital authority has as supplemental and additional powers, all those powers of a hospital authority granted in:

Section 7-57-301; provided, that no provision of that section pertaining to the relationship of a participating municipality to the operations of a metropolitan hospital authority shall limit or reduce any power that is granted to a private act metropolitan hospital authority by a private act of the general assembly; and

Sections 7-57-302, 7-57-304, 7-57-305, and 7-57-310.

In addition to powers otherwise granted by this part or any other public or private act of this state, or by any state regulation or federal law or regulation, and to the extent at the time not prohibited by the Constitution of Tennessee, a private act metropolitan hospital authority has, together with all powers incidental thereto or necessary to discharge the powers granted specifically in this part, the following powers:

Participate as a shareholder in a corporation, as a joint venturer in a joint venture, as a general partner in a general partnership, as a limited partner in a limited partnership or a general partnership, as a member in a nonprofit corporation or as a member of any other lawful form of business organization, that provides hospital, medical or health care or engages in any activity supporting or related to the exercise of any power granted to a private act metropolitan hospital authority;

Make or arrange for loans, contributions to capital and other debt and equity financing for the activities of any corporation of which such authority is the sole shareholder or sole member, and to guarantee loans and any other obligations for such purposes;

Elect all or any of the members of the board of directors of any nonprofit corporation of which the private act metropolitan hospital authority is a member and has the power to so elect under the nonprofit corporation charter and bylaws;

Create, establish, acquire, operate or support subsidiaries and affiliates, either for profit or nonprofit, to assist such private act metropolitan hospital authority in fulfilling its purposes;

Create, establish or support nonaffiliated for profit or nonprofit corporations or other lawful business organizations that operate and have as their purposes the furtherance of such private act metropolitan hospital authority's purposes;

Without limiting the generality of subdivisions (b)(4) and (5), accomplish and facilitate the creation, establishment, acquisition, operation or support of any such subsidiary, affiliate, nonaffiliated corporation or other lawful business organization, by means of loans of funds, acquisition or transfer of assets, leases of real or personal property, gifts and grants of funds or guarantees of indebtedness of such subsidiaries, affiliates and nonaffiliated corporations;

Indemnify any person, including for purposes of this subdivision (b)(7) such person's estate and personal representatives, made or threatened to be made a party to any action or proceeding, whether civil or criminal, by reason of the fact that that person is or was a board member or officer of such private act metropolitan hospital authority, or by reason of the fact that that person serves or served any other corporation or other entity or organization, whether for profit or not for profit, in any capacity at the request of the private act metropolitan hospital authority, against all judgments, fines, amounts paid in settlement and reasonable expenses, including, but not limited to, attorneys' fees actually and necessarily incurred, as a result of any such action or proceeding, or any appeal in an action or proceeding; provided, that nothing in this subdivision (b)(7) shall be construed as permitting indemnification of any person:

In connection with any malpractice or health care liability action or proceeding arising out of or in any way connected with such person's professional practice;

In connection with an action or proceeding by such private act metropolitan hospital authority in which a person is adjudged liable to such private act metropolitan hospital authority; or

In connection with any other action or proceeding in which such person is adjudged liable on the basis that personal benefit was improperly received by such person;

Make any other indemnification now or hereafter authorized by law;

Exercise in any other county either within or without this state any power that may be exercised in the county in which the private act metropolitan hospital authority's principal hospital, medical and health care facilities and programs are located, notwithstanding any other statute to the contrary, whenever in the judgment of its board of trustees the operation of the hospital authority's hospital, medical and health care or program facilities, or the quality of medical or health care for its citizens in the county of its principal hospital operations shall be enhanced through economic interest in or contractual arrangements with hospital, medical and health care facilities or programs located outside the county; and

Have and exercise all powers necessary or convenient to effect any or all the purposes for which a private act metropolitan hospital authority is organized.

In the exercise of its powers, including, but not limited to, the powers in this section, any other provision of this part and of any other law, a private act metropolitan hospital authority may acquire, manage, lease, purchase, sell, contract for or otherwise participate solely or with others in the ownership or operation of hospital, medical or health program properties and facilities and properties, facilities, and programs supporting or relating thereto of any kind and nature whatsoever and in any form of ownership whenever the board of trustees in its discretion shall determine it is consistent with the purposes and policies of this part or any private act applicable to it, and may exercise such powers regardless of the competitive consequences of the exercise of such powers.

Acts 1995, ch. 119, § 2; 2012, ch. 798, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. Powers of board of trustees of city hospital, OAG U97-037, 1997 Tenn. AG LEXIS 36 (7/28/97).

County hospital board of trustees' authority to sell hospital, OAG 98-0119, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 119 (7/2/98).

7-57-503. Bidding.

Any private act of the general assembly to the contrary notwithstanding, a private act metropolitan hospital authority shall not be required to bid the purchase or procurement of any goods or services that:

Are not required to be bid by a county under the County Purchasing Law of 1983, compiled in title 5, chapter 14, part 2;

Are not required to be bid by a municipality under the Municipal Purchasing Law of 1983, compiled in title 6, chapter 56, part 3;

Are of a nature that is exempt or otherwise not required to be bid by any municipality or county under any other law of general application of this state.

A private act metropolitan hospital authority shall not be subject to provisions for the letting of public contracts that may be provided in the charter or governing law of a creating municipality.

Acts 1995, ch. 119, § 3.

7-57-504. Implied powers — Construction.

In addition to all of the powers conferred upon it by this part or any other law, a private act metropolitan hospital authority may do any and all things necessary and convenient to carry out the powers expressly granted by this part or any other law. This part shall be construed consistent with §7-57-107.

Acts 1995, ch. 119, § 4.